North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47. Probate and Registration.
Article 4. Curative Statutes; Acknowledgments; Probates; Registration.
§ 47-108.19.
Validation of certain maps and plats that cannot be copied.

All maps and plats registered before June 1, 1983, pursuant to

G.S. 47-30

that met all of the requirements of that statute except that they were not on a material from which legible copies could be made or did not contain the original of the surveyor’s signature and acknowledgment are declared to be valid registrations.

History.

1983, c. 756.

§ 47-108.20.
Validation of certain recorded instruments that were not acknowledged.

All instruments recorded before April 1, 2021, that were not reexecuted and reacknowledged and that correct an obvious typographical or other minor error in a recorded instrument that was previously properly executed and acknowledged are valid instruments.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 842, s. 2; 2013-204, s. 1.38; 2021-91, s. 4(m).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.38, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “June 30, 1986”.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(m), effective October 1, 2021, substituted “April 1, 2021” for “April 1, 2013” and deleted “declared to be” preceding “valid.”

§ 47-108.21.
Sales for 1930 on dates other than first Monday in June validated.

All sales of land for failure to pay taxes held or conducted by any sheriff or any tax collector of any county, city, town, or other municipality during the year of 1930, on any day subsequent to or other than the first Monday in June of said year, are hereby approved, confirmed, validated, and declared to be proper, valid, and legal sales of such land and legally binding in all respects, and all certificates of sale made and issued upon and in accordance with such sales are hereby approved and validated to all intents and purposes with such full force and legal effect as if said sales had been held and conducted on said first Monday of June, 1930.

History.

1931, c. 160; 1971, c. 806, s. 1; 1987, c. 777, s. 4(1).

§ 47-108.22.
Tax sales for 1931-32 on day other than law provides and certificates validated.

All sales of land for failure to pay taxes held or conducted by any sheriff or any tax collector of any county, city, town, or other municipality during the years 1931 and 1932, on any day subsequent to or other than the first Monday in June of said year, are hereby approved, confirmed, validated, and declared to be proper, valid, and legal sales of such land and legally binding in all respects, and all certificates of sale made and issued upon and in accordance with such sales approved and validated to all intents and purposes with such full force and legal effect as if said sales had been held and conducted on said first Monday of June, 1931 and 1932.

History.

1933, c. 177; 1971, c. 806, s. 1; 1987, c. 777, s. 4(1).

§ 47-108.23.
Tax sales for 1933-34 and certificates validated.

All sales of land for failure to pay taxes held or conducted by any sheriff or any tax collector of any county, city, town, or other municipality during the years 1933 and 1934, or on any date subsequent to or other than the date prescribed by law, and all certificates of sale executed and issued pursuant to and in accordance with such sales be and the same are hereby approved, confirmed, and validated and shall have the same force and legal effect as if said sales had been held and conducted on the date prescribed by law.

The board of county commissioners of any county or the governing board of any city, town, or other municipality may by resolution order the sheriff or tax collecting officer of the said county, city, town, or other municipality to advertise in the manner provided by law and sell all land for the taxes of any year levied by the said county, city, town, or other municipality, which land has not heretofore been legally sold for the failure to pay said taxes. The sale or sales herein authorized shall be held not later than the first Monday in September 1935, and certificates of sale shall be issued in accordance with and pursuant to said sale or sales in the same manner as if said sale or sales had been held and conducted as provided by law. Any sale held and conducted under the provisions of this paragraph and all certificates issued pursuant to such a sale shall be and the same are hereby approved, confirmed, and validated and shall have the same force and legal effect as if said sale had been held and conducted on the date prescribed by law.

All actions instituted in any county, city, town, or other municipality for the foreclosure of certificates of sale issued for the taxes of the years 1927, 1928, 1929, 1930, 1931 and 1932 subsequent to October 1, 1934, and all such actions instituted before October 1, 1935, shall be and the same are hereby approved, validated, and declared to be legally binding and of the same force and effect as if said actions were instituted prior to October 1, 1934: Provided, that this section shall not be construed to repeal any private or local act passed by the General Assembly of 1935.

History.

1935, c. 331; 1971, c. 806, s. 1; 1987, c. 777, s. 4(1).

§ 47-108.24.
Notices of sale for taxes by publication validated.

All sales of real property under tax certificate foreclosures made between January 1, 1927, and March 13, 1937, where the original notice of sale was published for four successive weeks, and any notice of resale was published for two successive weeks, preceding said sales, whether the notice of sale was required to be published in a newspaper or at courthouse door, or both, shall be, and the same are in all respects validated as to publication of said notice: Provided said publication was completed as above set out within 10 days of the date of the sale.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the Counties of Alleghany, Beaufort, Cabarrus, Camden, Carteret, Caswell, Currituck, Halifax, Harnett, Henderson, Hertford, Hyde, Iredell, Johnston, Jones, Macon, Mitchell, Moore, Nash, New Hanover, Perquimans, Pitt, Polk, Rowan, Rutherford, Scotland, Surry, Wake, Warren, Washington, and Wayne.

History.

1937, c. 128; 1971, c. 806, s. 1; 1987, c. 777, s. 4(1).

§ 47-108.25.
Validation of sales and resales held pursuant to G.S. 105-374.

All sales or resales held prior to April 14, 1951, pursuant to

G.S. 105-374

, where the advertisement was in accordance with G.S. 1-327 and G.S. 1-328 as provided by such sections prior to their repeal, are validated to the same extent as if such advertisement were in accordance with Article 29A of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes; and all such sales, where the provisions of G.S. 45-28 as to resales, as provided by such section prior to its repeal, were followed, are validated to the same extent as if the resale procedure provided for in Article 29A of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes had been followed.

History.

1951, c. 1036, s. 2; 1971, c. 806, s. 1; 1987, c. 777, s. 4(1).

§ 47-108.26.
Validation of reconveyances of tax foreclosed property by county boards of commissioners.

The action of county boards of commissioners taken prior to March 20, 1951, reconveying tax foreclosed property by private sale to the former owners or other interested parties for amounts not less than such counties’ interest therein is hereby ratified, confirmed, and validated.

History.

1951, c. 300, s. 2; 1971, c. 806, s. 1; 1987, c. 777, s. 4(1).

§ 47-108.27.
Title to real property affected by boundary certification; liens.

Title to real property previously treated as being subject to the jurisdiction of the State of South Carolina but that is recognized as being within the boundaries of this State as a result of the certification of the boundary is not affected by the certification of the boundary or the recognition of the real property as being within the boundaries of this State. All conveyances and instruments of title, of any sort, made prior to the certification of the boundary shall be recognized and given full faith and credit in this State according to the law, jurisdiction, and terms in effect at the time of the conveyance in the jurisdiction the property was previously treated as being subject to. For the purposes of this subsection, ‘instruments of title‘ means any instrument that affects title or constitutes the chain of title to real property, including, but not limited to, all deeds, wills, estate documents evidencing transfer of title, plats, surveys, easements, rights-of-way, outstanding mortgages and deeds of trust, judicial orders or decrees, and documents evidencing intestate succession.

Liens recorded prior to the date of boundary certification with the register of deeds or docketed with the clerk of superior court in the county in this State where the affected parcel is situated shall attach, as a class, to the affected parcel as of the effective date and time of the boundary certification. This class of liens shall be assigned priority as of the date of boundary certification but shall retain the same priority among themselves as if this subsection did not apply.

History.

2016-23, s. 3(c), (d).

Cross References.

As to reestablishment of North Carolina-South Carolina boundary, see

G.S. 141-9

.

§ 47-108.28.
Seven-year curative statute.

An instrument conveying or purporting to convey an interest in real property that contains a defect, irregularity, or omission shall be deemed effective to vest title as stated therein and to the same extent as though the instrument had not contained the material defect, irregularity, or omission, if both of the following conditions are met:

The instrument is recorded by the register of deeds in the county or counties where the property is situated.

The material defect, irregularity, or omission is not corrected within seven years after the instrument was recorded.

The proper recordation and indexing of a curative instrument or a notice of lis pendens shall toll the seven-year curative period.

For the purposes of this section only, an instrument shall be deemed to contain a “defect, irregularity, or omission” when any of the following conditions are met:

The recorded instrument lacks any of the following:

A properly executed form of acknowledgment as provided under Article 3 of this Chapter or Chapter 10B of the General Statutes.

The proper recital of consideration paid.

The residence of a party.

The address of the property.

The address of a party.

The date of the instrument.

The date of any instrument or obligation secured by the instrument.

The proper affixation of seal by any person authorized to execute an instrument by virtue of an office or appointment held by the grantor that is required to affix the seal to the recorded instrument under applicable law.

The name of a grantor, trustor, mortgagor, assignor, borrower, or other person with an interest in the property does not appear in any part of the instrument, but the person executed the instrument without limitation or qualification. The person who executed the instrument without limitation or qualification shall be deemed to have conveyed or encumbered (as applicable) any interest or right such person then had in the property conveyed or encumbered by the terms of the instrument.

Nothing in this section is intended to modify any provisions of law pertaining to the competency or infancy of the grantor or the provisions of Chapter 22 of the General Statutes or to limit any remedies available under the laws of this State.

History.

2017-110, s. 3; 2021-91, s. 12.